_Full_Tex/texmf/tex/generic/hyphen/czhyph.tex
2\v res
\v re3ska
\v re3sko
\v re2sp
\v res3po
\v re4sr
\v re3sta
\v re3stu
\v re3st\'a
\v re3st\v r
\v re3tl
\v ret4\v r
\v re3zd
\v re3zk
4\v rezl
\v re3\v ct
\v ri1
\v ria3
\v ri3h
\v ri4h.
\v ri4hn
\v ri4j\v d
\v ri4l.
\v ri4lb
\v ril2n
4\v rine
\v ris2
3\v ri4t.
\v ri4v.
\v ri4vk
\v ri4vn
\v ri3z
\v ri\v c4t
\v ri3\v r
\v ri4\v s.
2\v rk
\v r2kl
\v rk4la
\v rk4li
\v rk4ly
\v rk4no
2\v r1l
2\v r1m
2\v rn
1\v ro
2\v rou
2\v r2p
2\v r1s
\v rs4to
2\v r1t
\v r2v
2\v rz
\v r\'a4pl
\v r\'a2sl
2\v r1\v c
2\v r\'id
\v r\'i4k\v r
\v r\'i1s
2\v r\v s
\v r3\v st
\v r\v s4ti
1\v s
2\v s.
\v sab3
\v sa4vl
2\v s1c
\v sej4d
\v sep3t
\v si4mr
2\v s2k
\v s3ka
\v s3ke
\v s3k3li
4\v s3kou
4\v skov
3\v skr
\v sk4ro
\v s3ku.
\v s3ky
2\v sl
\v s2la
\v s2li
\v s3liv
\v s2lo
\v sl\'a2
\v s2l\'e
\v s2l\'y
2\v s1m
\v smi4d
2\v sn
\v s2p
2\v s1s
2\v st
\v s4tip
\v st4ka
\v st4kl
\v s4t\v ek
\v s2t\v es
\v s4t\v ev
\v s4t\'ip
\v s2v
\v s\'i3d
\v s2\v n
\v s3\v s\'i
2\v s2\v t
\v s3\v to
\v s3\v tu
\v s3\v t\'a
1\v t
2\v t.
3\v tal
2\v tk
2\v tm
2\v tt
\v t\'a\v c4k
1\'u
\'u2c2
\'u2d
\'uj4ma
\'u2k
\'u2l
\'u2n
\'u2p
\'u2t
\'ut4ko
\'u2v
\'u2z
\'uz3k
\'u2\v c
3\'u\v ce
\'u\v re4z
\'u\v s4ti
\'u2\v z
\r u1b
\r u1c
\r u1hl
\r u3jd
\r u4jmov\'y
\r u1le
\r u1my
\r u1m\v e
\r u1ra
\r ur4va
\r ur4vy
\r u1s2
\r u2st
\r us3te
\r us3t\'an
\r ut2
\r u3tkl
\r u2v
\r u3va
\r u3vo
\r u3v\v e
\r u2z
\r u3zo
\r u2\v z
\r u3\v ze
\r u3\v zi
\r u3\v zo
\'y1b
\'y3cho
\'y1d
\'yd4la
\'y1h
\'y1j
\'y1l
\'y1ml
\'y1m\v e
\'y2n
\'y3no
\'ypo3\v c4
\'y1r
\'y1s2
\'y2sk
\'y1t
\'yt4ku
\'yt4ky
\'y1u
\'y4vli
\'y3zk
\'y3zn
\'y4zvu
\'y\v c4n\v e
\'y1\v r
\'y\v s3l
1\v z
2\v z.
\v za3d
\v za4tv
3\v za\v c
2\v z1b
2\v z1c
2\v z1d
\v ze2b3
\v zeh3n
\v ze4ml
\v ze4zg
\v zi4dl
\v zi4jm
3\v zil
\v zi2vl
2\v zk
\v zk4ni
2\v zl
\v z4lic
3\v zlo
2\v z1m
2\v zn
\v zon2
2\v z1s2
2\v z1t
\v z2v
\v z\'a4br
\v z\'a4nr
2\v z\v d
\v z\'i4zn
2\v z\v n
2\v z\v s
\v z\v s4ti
\v z\v s4t\v e
}
\endinput
%% 
%% End of file `czhyphen.tex'.
